Utah statutes.
20A-7-605.   Obtaining signatures -- Verification -- Removal of signature.

(1)  Any Utah voter may sign a local referendum petition if the voter is a legal voter and resides in the local jurisdiction.

(2) (a)  The sponsors shall ensure that the person in whose presence each signature sheet was signed:

(i)  is at least 18 years old and meets the residency requirements of Section 20A-2-105; and

(ii)  verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification printed on the last page of each referendum packet.

(b)  A person may not sign the verification printed on the last page of the referendum packet if the person signed a signature sheet in the referendum packet.

(3) (a)  Any voter who has signed a referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by submitting a notarized statement to that effect to the local clerk.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c), upon receipt of the statement, the local clerk shall remove the signature of the person submitting the statement from the referendum petition.

(c)  A local clerk may not remove signatures from a referendum petition after the petition has been submitted to the county clerk to be certified.



Amended by Chapter 72, 2012 General Session

